Utah statutes.
58-37f-203.   Submission, collection, and maintenance of data.

(1)  The pharmacist in charge of the drug outlet where a controlled substance is dispensed shall submit the data described in this section to the division:

(a)  in accordance with the requirements of this section;

(b)  in accordance with the procedures established by the division; and

(c)  in the format established by the division.

(2)  The pharmacist described in Subsection (1) shall, for each controlled substance dispensed by a pharmacist under the pharmacist's supervision other than those dispensed for an inpatient at a health care facility, submit to the division the following information:

(a)  the name of the prescribing practitioner;

(b)  the date of the prescription;

(c)  the date the prescription was filled;

(d)  the name of the individual for whom the prescription was written;

(e)  positive identification of the individual receiving the prescription, including the type of identification and any identifying numbers on the identification;

(f)  the name of the controlled substance;

(g)  the quantity of the controlled substance prescribed;

(h)  the strength of the controlled substance;

(i)  the quantity of the controlled substance dispensed;

(j)  the dosage quantity and frequency as prescribed;

(k)  the name of the drug outlet dispensing the controlled substance;

(l)  the name of the pharmacist dispensing the controlled substance; and

(m)  other relevant information as required by division rule.

(3) (a)  The division shall make rules, in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, to establish the electronic format in which the information required under this section shall be submitted to the division.

(b)  The division shall ensure that the database system records and maintains for reference:

(i)  the identification of each individual who requests or receives information from the database;

(ii)  the information provided to each individual; and

(iii)  the date and time that the information is requested or provided.

